Utah statutes.
6-1-5.   Notice of assignment.

The assignee shall forthwith give notice of such assignment:

(1) (a)  by publication once a week for six weeks:

(i)  in a newspaper published in the county; or

(ii)  if there is not a newspaper as described in Subsection (1)(a)(i), in a newspaper of general circulation in the county; and

(b)  by publication as required in Section 45-1-101 for six weeks; and

(2)  by mail to each creditor of whom he shall be informed, directed to his usual place of residence, requiring such creditor to present to him within three months thereafter his claims under oath.



Amended by Chapter 388, 2009 General Session

